Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1.3. Commission on Civics Education.

§§ 22.1-212.17 through 22.1-212.22.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 859, cl. 3, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 22.1-212.17 through 22.1-212.22, which established the Commission on Civics Education, was enacted by Acts 2005, c. 786, and amended by Acts 2008, cc. 237 and 669.